Utah statutes.
4-25-10.   Bulls -- Number required on range during breeding season.
No person during breeding season shall turn loose or range any cattle upon a
federal range or forest reserve located in this state without ranging one bull
for every 30 head of female breeding cattle ranged; provided, that a person
ranging any portion of 30 head of female breeding cattle may arrange for an
interest in a bull which is ranging on the federal range or the forest reserve
where such breeding cattle are located.
